Illinois, session 104th, HB4961.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by changing Section 609.2 and by 6adding Section 609.3 as follows: 7    (750 ILCS 5/609.2)8    Sec. 609.2. Parent's relocation. 9    (a) A parent's relocation constitutes a substantial change 10in circumstances for purposes of Section 610.5.11    (b) A parent who has been allocated a majority of 12parenting time or either parent who has been allocated equal 13parenting time may seek to relocate with a child.14    (c) A parent intending a relocation, as that term is 15defined in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (g) of 16Section 600 of this Act, must provide written notice of the 17relocation to the other parent under the parenting plan or 18allocation judgment. A copy of the notice required under this 19Section shall be filed with the clerk of the circuit court. The 20court may waive or seal some or all of the information required 21in the notice if there is a history of domestic violence.22    (d) The notice must provide at least 60 days' written 23notice before the relocation unless such notice is   HB4961- 2 -LRB104 20032 JRC 33483 b1impracticable (in which case written notice shall be given at 2the earliest date practicable) or unless otherwise ordered by 3the court. At a minimum, the notice must set forth the 4following:5        (1) the intended date of the parent's relocation;6        (2) the address of the parent's intended new 7    residence, if known; and8        (3) the length of time the relocation will last, if 9    the relocation is not for an indefinite or permanent 10    period.11    The court may consider a parent's failure to comply with 12the notice requirements of this Section without good cause (i) 13as a factor in determining whether the parent's relocation is 14in good faith; and (ii) as a basis for awarding reasonable 15attorney's fees and costs resulting from the parent's failure 16to comply with these provisions.17    (e) If the non-relocating parent signs the notice that was 18provided pursuant to subsection (c) and the relocating parent 19files the notice with the court, relocation shall be allowed 20without any further court action. The court shall modify the 21parenting plan or allocation judgment to accommodate a 22parent's relocation as agreed by the parents, as long as the 23agreed modification is in the child's best interests.24    (f) If the non-relocating parent objects to the 25relocation, fails to sign the notice provided under subsection 26(c), or the parents cannot agree on modification of the   HB4961- 3 -LRB104 20032 JRC 33483 b1parenting plan or allocation judgment, the parent seeking 2relocation must file a petition seeking permission to 3relocate.4    (g) The court shall modify the parenting plan or 5allocation judgment in accordance with the child's best 6interests. The court shall consider the following factors:7        (1) the circumstances and reasons for the intended 8    relocation;9        (2) the reasons, if any, why a parent is objecting to 10    the intended relocation;11        (3) the history and quality of each parent's 12    relationship with the child and specifically whether a 13    parent has substantially failed or refused to exercise the 14    parental responsibilities allocated to him or her under 15    the parenting plan or allocation judgment;16        (4) the educational opportunities for the child at the 17    existing location and at the proposed new location;18        (5) the presence or absence of extended family at the 19    existing location and at the proposed new location;20        (6) the anticipated impact of the relocation on the 21    child;22        (7) whether the court will be able to fashion a 23    reasonable allocation of parental responsibilities between 24    all parents if the relocation occurs;25        (8) the wishes of the child, taking into account the 26    child's maturity and ability to express reasoned and   HB4961- 4 -LRB104 20032 JRC 33483 b1    independent preferences as to relocation;2        (9) possible arrangements for the exercise of parental 3    responsibilities appropriate to the parents' resources and 4    circumstances and the developmental level of the child;5        (10) minimization of the impairment to a parent-child 6    relationship caused by a parent's relocation; and7        (11) any other relevant factors bearing on the child's 8    best interests; and .9        (12) whether a parent has engaged in 10    immigration-status coercion or has withheld 11    immigration-related documentation in a manner that is 12    reasonably likely to cause the child to be separated from 13    a parent, destabilize the child's primary caregiving, or 14    otherwise negatively affect the child's safety and 15    well-being. 16    (h) If a parent moves with the child 25 miles or less from 17the child's current primary residence to a new primary 18residence outside Illinois, Illinois continues to be the home 19state of the child under subsection (c) of Section 202 of the 20Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act. Any 21subsequent move from the new primary residence outside 22Illinois greater than 25 miles from the child's original 23primary residence in Illinois must be in compliance with the 24provisions of this Section.25(Source: P.A. 99-90, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB4961- 5 -LRB104 20032 JRC 33483 b1    (750 ILCS 5/609.3 new)2    Sec. 609.3. Immigration-status coercion.3    (a) As used in this Act, "immigration-status coercion" is 4conduct by a parent intended to control or intimidate the 5other parent by:6        (1) withholding immigration documents needed to 7    maintain lawful status;8        (2) refusing to provide information necessary to file 9    or renew lawful status if that parent has unique access; 10    or11        (3) threatening to report or cause reporting to 12    immigration authorities.13    (b) If a relocating parent files a petition under Section 14609.2 and submits a sworn statement with documentation stating 15the parent's lawful status expires within 180 days and there 16is an inability or difficulty renewing that parent's status 17substantially caused by the other parent's immigration-status 18coercion or withholding necessary documentation, then the 19court must set the relocation petition for hearing as soon as 20practicable but no less than 30 days from its filing.